Hawaii statutes.
[§11-430] Application for public
funds. (a) Each application for public funds shall be signed by the
candidate and notarized, and accompanied by the qualifying campaign
contribution statement or statements.

(b) The application shall be mailed or delivered
to the commission and shall not be valid unless received by the commission no
later than thirty days after the general election.

(c) Each candidate in receipt of the minimum qualifying
contribution amount established for the office that the candidate seeks may
apply to the commission for public funding after the candidate has become a
candidate in a primary or general election. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next